Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.569

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Early learning facilities revolving account—Early learning facilities development account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

(1) The early learning facilities revolving account and the early learning facilities development account are created in the state treasury.

(2) Revenues to the early learning facilities revolving account shall consist of appropriations by the legislature, early learning facilities grant and loan repayments, taxable bond proceeds, and all other sources deposited in the account.

(3) Revenues to the early learning facilities development account shall consist of tax exempt bond proceeds.

(4) Expenditures from the accounts shall be used, in combination with other private and public funding, for state matching funds for the planning, renovation, purchase, and construction of early learning facilities as established in RCW 43.31.573 through 43.31.583 and 43.84.092.

(5) Expenditures from the accounts are subject to appropriation and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

(6) The early learning facilities revolving account shall be known as the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities revolving account.

(7) The early learning facilities development account shall be known as the Ruth LeCocq Kagi early learning facilities development account.

[2021 c 130 s 3; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.